Alabama, session 2026rs, HB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
33 Section 1. Sections 34-7B-1, 34-7B-13, and 34-7B-30 of
34 the Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
35 "§34-7B-1
36 For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
37 shall have the following meanings:
38 (1) APPRENTICE. Any person individual engaged in
39 learning the practices defined in this article including, but
40 not limited to, assisting in the performance of any acts of
41 barbering or cosmetology on the general public under the
42 constant and direct supervision of a person an individual who
43 has held a valid current license issued by the board for at
44 least five two years, in a shop or studio licensed by the
45 board.
46 (2) BARBERING. The occupation of shaving or trimming
47 the beard, cutting or dressing the hair, giving facial or
48 scalp massages, giving facial or scalp treatment with oils or
49 creams or other preparations made for that purpose, either by
50 hand or by means of mechanical appliances, singeing and
51 shampooing the hair, dyeing the hair, or permanently waving or
52 straightening the hair of any living or deceased person
53 individual for compensation, as performed by a Class 2 barber.
54 (3) BOARD. The Alabama Board of Cosmetology and
55 Barbering.
56 (4) CLASS 1 BARBER. A person An individual who only
Page 2

(4) CLASS 1 BARBER. A person An individual who only
HB47 INTRODUCED
57 does the following in his or her ordinary course of business:
58 Arranges, cleans, cuts, or singes the hair of any person
59 individual or massages, cleans, stimulates, exercises, or does
60 similar work on the scalp, face, or neck of any person
61 individual with the hands, or with mechanical or electrical
62 apparatus or appliance, or by the use of cosmetic
63 preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams. Any one
64 or a combination of the following practices, when done upon
65 the human body above the seventh cervical vertebra for
66 cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or
67 physical or mental ailments, and when done for payment,
68 directly or indirectly or without payment for the public
69 generally: Shaving or trimming the beard or trimming the hair.
70 (5) CLASS 2 BARBER. Any person individual, other than a
71 student or apprentice, who performs barbering on the general
72 public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
73 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
74 chapter article for a Class 2 barber. For the purposes of this
75 chapter article, the term barber, standing alone, shall be
76 deemed a reference to a Class 2 barber.
77 (6) COSMETOLOGIST. Any person individual, other than a
78 student or apprentice, who performs cosmetology on the general
79 public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
80 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
81 article for a cosmetologist.
82 (7) COSMETOLOGY. Any of the practices generally
83 recognized as beauty culture, hairdressing, or any other
84 designation engaged in by any person individual who performs
Page 3

designation engaged in by any person individual who performs
HB47 INTRODUCED
85 such on the general public for compensation including, but not
86 limited to, cleansing, singeing, cutting, arranging, dressing,
87 curling, braiding, waxing, bleaching, weaving, coloring the
88 hair by hand or mechanical apparatus, the use of creams,
89 lotions, or cosmetic preparations, with or without massage, on
90 the scalp, face, arms, legs, feet, or hands, esthetics
91 practices, nail technology, manicure, pedicure, or
92 desairology.
93 (8) ESTHETICIAN. Any person individual, other than a
94 student or apprentice, who performs esthetics on the general
95 public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
96 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
97 article for an esthetician.
98 (9)(10) ESTHETICS. The practice of performing acts of
99 skin care including, but not limited to, facials, body waxing,
100 makeup application, and general esthetics procedures on the
101 general public for compensation.
102 (10)(11) ESTHETICS/MANICURE. A combination of the
103 practices of esthetics and manicure.
104 (11)(9) ESTHETICIAN/MANICURIST. Any person individual,
105 other than a student or apprentice, who performs a combination
106 of the practices of esthetics and manicure on the general
107 public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
108 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
109 article for an esthetician/manicurist.
110 (12) INSTRUCTOR. A licensee who teaches in a licensed
111 or registered school of barbering or any branch of cosmetology
112 and completes any applicable requirements for continuing
Page 4

and completes any applicable requirements for continuing
HB47 INTRODUCED
113 education.
114 (13) LASH/BROW APPLICATION. The practice of performing
115 temporary, semi-permanent lash application services including,
116 but not limited to, strip lashes, cluster lashes, individual
117 and single lashes, lash extensions, brow tint, brow
118 laminations, brow wax, brow arch, brow extensions, brow
119 threading, and lash lift. The term does not include
120 microblading, microshading, or microfeathering.
121 (14) LASH/BROW ARTIST. Any individual, other than a
122 student or apprentice, who performs lash/brow application
123 services on the general public for compensation and who shall
124 satisfy the qualifications and permitting requirements
125 provided in this article for a lash/brow artist.
126 (13)(15) LICENSE. A document issued by the board which
127 entitles the holder to practice the profession listed on the
128 document.
129 (14)(16) LICENSEE. Any person individual holding a
130 license issued pursuant to this article.
131 (17) MAKEUP APPLICATION. The practice of applying
132 professional beauty and cosmetic preparations and products to
133 the skin, eyebrows, and lashes of the faces and necks of the
134 general public for compensation to enhance, alter, or
135 transform an individual's appearance including, but not
136 limited to, manual makeup applications, airbrush application,
137 temporary and semi-permanent false lash application including
138 lash lift, strip lash, individual lash, single lash, cluster
139 lash, lash extensions, lash tint, brow tint, brow wax, brow
140 arch, face wax, chin wax, upper lip wax, brow threading, brow
Page 5

arch, face wax, chin wax, upper lip wax, brow threading, brow
HB47 INTRODUCED
141 lamination, prosthetic, special effects, and desairology.
142 (18) MAKEUP ARTIST. Any individual, other than a
143 student or apprentice, who performs makeup application on the
144 general public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
145 qualifications and licensing requirements provided in this
146 article for a makeup artist.
147 (15)(19) MANICURE. The practice of beautifying or
148 grooming the fingernails, toenails, adding nail tips,
149 extensions, gels, or massaging the hands, forearms, feet, or
150 lower legs of the general public for compensation.
151 (16)(21) MANICURIST. Any person individual, other than
152 a student or apprentice, who performs the practice of manicure
153 on the general public for compensation, and who shall satisfy
154 the qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
155 article for a manicurist.
156 (17)(20) MANICURE/WAXING. A combination of the
157 practices of manicure and waxing.
158 (18)(22) MANICURIST/WAXER. Any person individual, other
159 than a student or apprentice, who performs a combination of
160 the practices of manicure and waxing on the general public for
161 compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
162 licensure requirements provided in this article for a
163 manicurist/waxer.
164 (19)(23) NATURAL HAIR STYLING. The practice of
165 cleansing, weaving or interweaving, extending, locking,
166 braiding, or arranging the hair without cutting, coloring,
167 permanent waving, relaxing, removing, or chemical treatments.
168 (20)(24) NATURAL HAIRSTYLIST. Any person individual,
Page 6

(20)(24) NATURAL HAIRSTYLIST. Any person individual,
HB47 INTRODUCED
169 other than a student, who performs natural hair styling on the
170 general public for compensation, and who shall satisfy the
171 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
172 article for a natural hairstylist.
173 (21)(25) SCHOOL. An establishment licensed or
174 registered by the board to teach any or all of the practices
175 of barbering or cosmetology.
176 (22)(26) SHAMPOO ASSISTANT. Any person individual who
177 is licensed to perform only the practices of shampooing,
178 cleansing, or applying temporary weekly color rinses to the
179 hair of the general public for compensation, and who shall
180 satisfy the qualifications and licensure requirements provided
181 in this article for a shampoo assistant.
182 (23)(27) SHOP. Any place where barbering or cosmetology
183 is practiced including, but not limited to, a mobile salon.
184 Only a properly licensed person individual, who is not an
185 apprentice or a student, may operate a shop.
186 (24)(28) STUDENT. Any person individual who is engaged
187 in learning any practice regulated by this article in a school
188 licensed or registered pursuant to this article, and who, as
189 part of the learning process, performs or assists in any
190 practice regulated by this article under the immediate
191 supervision of an instructor who is licensed pursuant to this
192 article.
193 (29) STUDIO. Any place where makeup, brow, lash, or
194 other esthetics services are practiced including, but not
195 limited to, a mobile studio or salon. Only a properly licensed
196 individual, who is not an apprentice or student, may operate a
Page 7

individual, who is not an apprentice or student, may operate a
HB47 INTRODUCED
197 studio or salon.
198 (25)(31) THREADING. The practice of eyebrow removal
199 with the use of a loop made of cotton or any other material.
200 (26)(30) THREADER. Any person individual engaged in the
201 practice of threading on the general public for compensation,
202 and who shall satisfy the qualifications and licensure
203 requirements provided in this article for a threader."
204 "§34-7B-13
205 This chapter does not apply to any of the following
206 individuals, persons, activities, or services:
207 (1) Service in the case of emergency or domestic
208 upheaval, without compensation.
209 (2) Licensed medical professionals operating within the
210 scope of their normal practice.
211 (3) Personnel of the United States armed services Armed
212 Services performing their ordinary duties.
213 (4) Any public trade school or other public school or
214 school program under the purview of the State Board of
215 Education or a local board of education.
216 (5) Any person individual who only occasionally dresses
217 hair and receives no compensation therefor, or does any other
218 act or thing mentioned in this chapter, without holding
219 himself or herself out to the public as a provider of any
220 practices defined in this chapter article for compensation.
221 (6) Departments in retail establishments where
222 cosmetics are demonstrated and offered for sale but where no
223 other acts of cosmetology or barbering are performed.
224 (7) The licensees of any county or municipal barber
Page 8

(7) The licensees of any county or municipal barber
HB47 INTRODUCED
225 board or commission in existence on August 1, 2013, unless
226 such board or commission elects, by resolution adopted by the
227 governing body of the county or municipality, to come under
228 the provisions of this chapter.
229 (8) Any person individual who practices as a Class 1
230 barber.
231 (9) Any individual who works exclusively under contract
232 with the International Alliance of Theatrical Stage Employees
233 (IATSE), or its successor organization."
234 "§34-7B-30
235 (a)(1) Beginning January 1, 2022, the The board may
236 issue a license for the operation of a mobile salon or mobile
237 studio to an applicant who submits an application on a form
238 approved by the board, pays required fees as determined by
239 rule of the board, and is in compliance with this article.
240 (2) Requirements that apply to a shop under this
241 article shall apply to mobile salons, except to the extent
242 that the requirements conflict with rules adopted by the board
243 under subsection (b).
244 (b) By January 1, 2022, the The board shall adopt rules
245 to implement this section including, but not limited to, the
246 establishment of fees and minimum specifications for the
247 facilities, technical equipment, environment, supplies,
248 personnel, operation, ownership, and procedures for the
249 operation of mobile salons and mobile studios."
250 Section 2. Sections 34-7B-25.1 and 34-7B-25.2 are added
251 to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
252 §34-7B-25.1
Page 9

§34-7B-25.1
HB47 INTRODUCED
253 (a) Subject to subsection (c), no individual may be
254 admitted to an examination or licensed as a makeup artist
255 unless he or she satisfies all of the following
256 qualifications:
257 (1) Is at least 16 years of age.
258 (2) Has successfully completed at least 10 grades in
259 secondary school, or the equivalent.
260 (3) Has successfully completed one, or a combination
261 of, the following:
262 a. At least 300 clock hours of makeup application
263 instruction in a school licensed or registered under this
264 article or on courses reported in credit hours. Credit hour
265 programs shall be reviewed and approved by the board as
266 satisfying licensure requirements.
267 b. At least 600 hours in a shop or studio, over a
268 period of two years and not exceeding eight hours a day or 48
269 hours a week, under the immediate supervision of a makeup
270 artist, esthetician, or cosmetologist who has been
271 continuously licensed under this article for at least two
272 years.
273 (b) Any applicant for a makeup artist license who
274 satisfies the qualifications in subsection (a), registers with
275 the board, pays any applicable examination fee, successfully
276 completes any required examination, and pays an original
277 license fee shall be issued a makeup artist license. Any
278 individual licensed pursuant to this section shall be subject
279 to this article and rules adopted by the board including, but
280 not limited to, shop or studio requirements, sanitation
Page 10

not limited to, shop or studio requirements, sanitation
HB47 INTRODUCED
281 procedures, and license renewal.
282 (c) Any individual who, on August 1, 2026, has been
283 professionally applying makeup for at least two years and who
284 submits proof satisfactory to the board of the following: (i)
285 maintaining a professional website for at least two years;
286 (ii) maintaining insurance coverage of a type and in an amount
287 required by board rule; (iii) completing a 16-hour course
288 approved and administered by the board or a third-party
289 provider approved by the board; and (iv) demonstrating
290 proficiency pursuant to a skills examination administered by
291 the board, upon payment of the applicable license fee by
292 January 1, 2027, shall be licensed by the board as a makeup
293 artist under this section.
294 §34-7B-25.2
295 (a) Subject to subsection (c), no individual may be
296 admitted to an examination or issued a permit as a lash/brow
297 artist unless he or she possesses all the following
298 qualifications:
299 (1) Is at least 16 years of age.
300 (2) Has successfully completed at least 10 grades in
301 secondary school, or the equivalent.
302 (3) Has successfully completed one, or a combination
303 of, the following:
304 a. At least 250 clock hours of lash and brow
305 application instruction in a school licensed or registered
306 under this article or on courses reported in credit hours.
307 Credit hour programs shall be reviewed and approved by the
308 board as satisfying permitting requirements.
Page 11

board as satisfying permitting requirements.
HB47 INTRODUCED
309 b. At least 500 hours in a shop or studio, over a
310 period of two years and not exceeding eight hours a day or 48
311 hours a week, under the immediate supervision of a makeup
312 artist, cosmetologist, esthetician, or lash/brow artist who
313 has been continuously licensed under this article for at least
314 two years.
315 (b) Any applicant for a lash/brow permit who satisfies
316 the qualifications in subsection (a), registers with the
317 board, pays any applicable examination fee, successfully
318 completes any required examination, and pays an original
319 license fee shall be issued a lash/brow artist permit. Any
320 individual permitted as a lash/brow artist pursuant to this
321 section shall be subject to this article and rules adopted by
322 the board including, but not limited to, shop or studio
323 requirements, sanitation procedures, and permit renewal.
324 (c) Any individual who, on August 1, 2026, has been
325 professionally engaging in lash/brow application for at least
326 two years and who submits proof satisfactory to the board of
327 the following: (i) maintaining a professional website for at
328 least two years; (ii) maintaining insurance coverage of a type
329 and in an amount required by board rule; (iii) completing a
330 16-hour course approved and administered by the board or a
331 third-party provider approved by the board; and (iv)
332 demonstrating proficiency pursuant to a skills examination
333 administered by the board, upon payment of the applicable
334 license fee by January 1, 2027, shall be issued a permit by
335 the board as a lash/brow artist under this section.
336 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
Page 12

Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
HB47 INTRODUCED
337 1, 2026.
Page 13